Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626A.35, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2c. new text end new text begin Exception; fleeing motor vehicles. new text end new text begin The prohibition under subdivision 1 does not apply to the use of a mobile tracking device on a fleeing motor vehicle. For purposes of this subdivision, "flee" has the meaning given in section 609.487, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end